Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Business Trusts

386.370.
Definition of business trust, business entity, and name of record.

A business trust is an express trust created by a written declaration of trust whereby property is conveyed to one (1) or more trustees, who hold and manage same for the benefit and profit of such persons as may be or become, the holders of transferable certificates evidencing the beneficial interest in the trust estate. For the purposes of KRS

386.370

to

386.440

, business trusts shall include but are not limited to “Real Estate Investment Trusts” as defined by and which comply with the Federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended or such section or sections of any subsequent Internal Revenue Code as may be applicable to real estate investment trusts.

“Business entity” means a domestic or foreign limited liability company, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and not-for-profit unincorporated association.

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of a business entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, §
1; 2007, ch. 137, §
164, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
164, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

386.380.
Establishment — Lawful purposes.

A business trust may be established by a declaration of trusts, duly executed by one (1) or more trustees, for any lawful purpose including, but not limited to, acquiring, managing, improving, leasing, dealing in, selling, or otherwise alienating, mortgaging, or otherwise encumbering, real and personal property of all kinds and descriptions, including dealing in, purchasing, holding, selling and exchanging stocks, bonds, mortgages, deeds of trust and other securities of all kinds and descriptions; receiving the income, dividends, rents, profits, and returns therefrom, and investing same or distributing same to the beneficial owners of the trust in accordance with the terms of the declaration of trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, § 2.

386.382.
Name of business trust.

The name of a business trust or foreign business trust qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 19, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., 2010, ch. 51, §
19, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
114, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.384.
Registered office — Registered agent.

Each domestic business trust and each foreign business trust authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth a registered office and a registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
20, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
20, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
115, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.386.
Change of registered office or registered agent. [Repealed.]

386.388.
Resignation of registered agent. [Repealed.]

386.390.
Powers and liabilities of trustees — Liability of trust for acts of trustees.

The trustees shall hold the legal title to all property at any time belonging to the business trust. They shall have control over such property as well as the control and management of the business and affairs of the business trust. Liability to third persons for any act, omission or obligation of a trustee of a business trust, when acting in such capacity shall extend to the whole of the trust estate, or so much thereof as may be necessary to discharge such obligation, but no trustee shall be personally liable for any such act, omission or obligation unless said act, omission or obligation constitute fraud or bad faith. The trustee shall have such powers as to the investment of the trust estate as may be set out in the declaration of trust without regard to the type of investments to which trustees generally are restricted by the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, § 3.

386.392.
Annual report.

Each business trust and each foreign business trust qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
24, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
24, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
116, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.400.
Certificates of ownership — Liability of beneficial owners.

The beneficial ownership in a business trust shall be evidenced by certificates issued by the trustees. These certificates shall be transferable in the same manner as stock certificates of a corporation are transferable. No assessment shall be made against the interest of any beneficial owner and no beneficial owner shall be personally liable for any debts or liabilities incurred by the trustees or by the business trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, § 4.

386.410.
Legality of foreign business trust.

No beneficial owner of certificates in a foreign business trust shall have his interests therein assessed and no beneficial owner of a foreign trust shall be personally liable for any debts or liabilities incurred by the trustees or by the foreign business trust after June 16, 1966.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, §
5; 2007, ch. 137, §
165, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
165, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.420.
Contents and recordation of declaration of trust.

The written declaration of trust may provide for the election of successor trustees in the event of the death, resignation and removal of a trustee and may provide for the amendment of the declaration of trust. The declaration of trust may also contain such other provisions regarding the operating and administration of the business trust as may be necessary or desirable. A declaration of trust and any amendments thereto is effective as provided in KRS

14A.2-070

.

A declaration of trust filed on or after June 26, 2007, shall name or shall be accompanied by a document naming the initial registered agent and registered office satisfying the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

.

Each document delivered to the Secretary of State for filing by a business trust or a foreign business trust shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, §
6; 1968, ch. 152, §
161; 1978, ch. 384, §
511, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, §
166, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 166, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 117, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.430.
Duration of business trust — Rules against perpetuities and restraint of alienation not violated.

A business trust shall not be deemed invalid as violating the rule against perpetuities or the law against suspension of the powers of alienation. Such trust may continue for such time as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it may be created, provided the declaration of trust contains a provision that such trust may be terminated at any time by action of the trustees or by the vote of a specified percentage in interest of the beneficial owners thereof as set forth in the declaration of trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, § 7.

386.432.
Administrative dissolution — Reinstatement. [Repealed.]

386.440.
How business trust sued.

A business trust may be sued for debts and other obligations incurred by the trustees in the performance of their duties under the declaration of trust, and for any damages resulting from the negligence of such trustees and its property shall be subject to attachment and execution in like manner as if it were a corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 19, §
8; 2007, ch. 137, §
167, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
167, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.441.
Service of process. [Repealed.]

386.4420.
Laws governing foreign business trust.

Subject to the Constitution of this Commonwealth:

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign business trust is organized shall govern its organization and internal affairs, including the liability of its trustees and beneficial owners for the debts and obligations of the business trust and the inspection by a trustee or a beneficial owner of the books and records of the business trust; and

A foreign business trust shall not be denied registration by reason of any difference between the laws of another jurisdiction under which a foreign business trust is organized and the laws of this Commonwealth.

A certificate of authority obtained pursuant to this chapter shall not authorize a foreign business trust to exercise any powers or engage in any business that a domestic business trust is forbidden to exercise or engage in by the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
26, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
26, effective July 15, 2010.

386.4422.
Transaction of business by foreign business trust.

A foreign business trust transacting business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.9-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 27, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 27, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
118, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 29, § 21, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 24, provides that the amendments to this section in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 11, are retroactive to January 1, 2011.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.4424.
Certificate of authority required of foreign business trust for access to courts — Civil penalty for violation. [Repealed.]

386.4426.
Application for certificate of authority for foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4428.
Amended certificate of authority for foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4430.
Effect of certificate of authority for foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4432.
Name used by foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4434.
Registered office and registered agent for foreign business trust.

Each foreign business trust authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth a registered office and a registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
33, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
33, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
119, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

386.4436.
Change of registered office or registered agent for foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4438.
Statement of resignation of registered agent of foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4440.
Service of process on foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4442.
Certificate of withdrawal of foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4444.
Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority of foreign business trust. [Repealed.]

386.4446.
Notice of determination — Revocation of certificate — Effect of revocation. [Repealed.]

386.4448.
Appeal of revocation. [Repealed.]